District of Columbia statutes.
31-108

Abolition of Insurance Administration.

The Insurance Administration in the Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs as currently organized is abolished.

History

May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 9, 44 DCR 1730

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-128.